District of Columbia statutes.
24-531.13

General provisions.

(a)

Nothing in this chapter shall preclude a person confined under the authority of this chapter from establishing his or her eligibility for release under the provisions of this chapter by a writ of habeas corpus.

(b)

The provisions of this chapter shall supersede in the District of Columbia the provisions of any federal statutes or parts thereof inconsistent with this chapter.

(c)

When a person has been ordered confined in a hospital for the mentally ill pursuant to this chapter and has escaped from such hospital, the court which ordered confinement shall, upon request of the government, order the return of the escaped person to such hospital. The return order shall be effective throughout the United States. Any federal judicial officer within whose jurisdiction the escaped person shall be found shall, upon receipt of the return order issued by the committing court, cause such person to be apprehended and delivered up for return to such hospital.

May 24, 2005, D.C. Law 15-358, § 113, 52 DCR 2015

History